Illinois, session 104th, HB1818.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 9-20, 16-8, 16-105, and 23-15 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/9-20)7    Sec. 9-20. Property assessment records record cards. 8    (a) In all counties, all property records record cards 9maintained by a township assessor, multi-township assessor, or 10chief county assessment officer shall be public records, and 11shall be available for public inspection during business 12hours, subject to reasonable rules and regulations of the 13custodian of the records. Upon request and payment of such 14reasonable fee established by the custodian, a copy or 15printout shall be provided to any person.16    (b) Property assessment records record cards may be 17established and maintained on electronic equipment or 18microfiche, and that system may be the exclusive record of 19property information. Where assessment records are presently 20maintained in electronic format, the township assessor, 21multi-township assessor, or chief county assessment officer 22shall make those records available for immediate public 23inspection through Internet access. Where assessment records,   HB1818- 2 -LRB104 08839 HLH 18894 b1or some of them, are not presently maintained in electronic 2format, the township assessor, multi-township assessor, or 3chief county assessment officer shall, as soon as may be 4feasible, convert all assessment records into electronic 5format and maintain those records in that format thereafter, 6and shall, as soon as feasible, make those records available 7for immediate public inspection, preferably through Internet 8access.9    (c) When a person requests a copy of a record maintained in 10an electronic format, the custodian of the records shall 11furnish it in the electronic format specified by the 12requester, if feasible. If it is not feasible to furnish the 13records in the specified electronic format, then the custodian 14shall furnish it in the format in which it is maintained by the 15assessor or chief county assessment officer or in paper format 16at the option of the requester. The assessor or chief county 17assessment officer may charge the requester for the actual 18cost of purchasing the recording medium, whether disc, 19diskette, tape or other medium. The requester may not be 20charged for the costs of any search and review of the records 21or other personnel costs associated with reproducing the 22records, except that charges may be made in cases of 23commercial requests as provided in subsection (f) of Section 6 24of the Freedom of Information Act. 25    (d) "Commercial request" has the meaning provided in the 26Freedom of Information Act, provided that any request made by   HB1818- 3 -LRB104 08839 HLH 18894 b1a taxpayer or the taxpayer's legal representative for purposes 2of reviewing or challenging the accuracy, legality, or 3constitutionality of the taxpayer's assessment or other 4assessments in relation to such a review or challenge shall 5not be considered to be a commercial request. 6(Source: P.A. 83-1312; 88-455.) 7    (35 ILCS 200/16-8)8    Sec. 16-8. Books and records of chief county assessment 9officer. 10    (a) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 11chief county assessment officer shall maintain records of the 12assessed value of each parcel of property and shall enter upon 13appropriate the property records record card of each town or 14city lot or parcel of land the elements (or basis) of valuation 15and computations that are taken into consideration by the 16chief county assessment officer in ascertaining and 17determining the fair cash value of each town or city lot or 18parcel of land and improvements of each improvement thereon, 19including the basic approach (cost, sales comparison, or 20income) used to estimate the value of the property, and all 21other elements or factors (shown by percentages or otherwise) 22that were taken into consideration in determining the fair 23cash value of each parcel of property, including, but not 24limited to, capitalization rates and tax loads, rental income 25data and any adjustments thereto, ratios of expenses to   HB1818- 4 -LRB104 08839 HLH 18894 b1income, net income, vacancy and collection loss, reproduction 2or replacement cost calculators or manuals, physical, 3functional, and economic depreciation or obsolescence, and 4comparable sales and sales adjustment factors. The disclosure 5of the elements (or basis) of valuation on the assessment 6records shall be sufficient to explain how the fair cash value 7and the assessment of each parcel of property was estimated 8and determined by the chief county assessment officer as 9enhancing or detracting elements (such as depth, corner, 10alley, railway or other elements). The assessment officer 11shall maintain the records for at least 10 years. Upon request 12by the board of appeals (until the first Monday in December 131998 and the board of review beginning the first Monday in 14December 1998 and thereafter), the officer shall immediately 15furnish all of the requested records to the board. The records 16shall be available, on request, to the taxpayer at any time, as 17provided in Section 9-20. The chief county assessment officer 18shall certify, in writing, the amount of the assessment to the 19board. If the records maintained by the chief county 20assessment officer at the time the assessment is certified to 21the board and at all times thereafter do not disclose under 22subsection (a) contain none of the elements (or basis) of 23valuation for the parcel sufficiently to explain how the 24valuation of that parcel was determined, then any increase by 25the chief county assessment officer shall be considered 26invalid by the board of review, the Property Tax Appeal Board,   HB1818- 5 -LRB104 08839 HLH 18894 b1or the circuit court acting on a complaint under this Code 2Section 16-120; and no action by the board of review under 3Section 16-120 shall result in an increase in the valuation 4for the parcel for the current assessment year.5    (b) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 6notice given by the chief county assessment officer to a 7taxpayer of a proposed increase in assessment shall designate 8the reason for the increase. If a taxpayer files an assessment 9complaint with the chief county assessment officer, the 10notification to the taxpayer of a determination on the 11assessment complaint shall designate the reason for the 12result.13    (c) The provisions of this Section shall be applicable 14beginning with the assessment for the 1997 tax year.15(Source: P.A. 89-718, eff. 3-7-97; 90-4, eff. 3-7-97.) 16    (35 ILCS 200/16-105)17    Sec. 16-105. Time of meeting - Public records. In counties 18with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the board of appeals 19(until the first Monday in December 1998 and the board of 20review beginning the first Monday in December 1998 and 21thereafter) shall meet on or before the second Monday in 22September in each year for the purpose of revising the 23assessment of property as provided for in this Code. The 24meeting may be adjourned from day to day as may be necessary. 25    All hearings conducted by the board under this Code shall   HB1818- 6 -LRB104 08839 HLH 18894 b1be open to the public. All files maintained by the board 2relating to the matters specified in Sections 16-95, 16-100, 3and 16-140 shall be available for public inspection during 4regular office hours. However, only the actual portions of the 5income tax return relating to the property for which a 6complaint has been filed shall be a public record. Copies of 7such records shall be furnished upon request in the same 8manner and upon the same terms as is provided with respect to 9assessment records under Section 9-20. Whenever possible, all 10such records shall be maintained by the board of review in 11electronic format and shall be made available for immediate 12public inspection, preferably through internet access. The 13board may charge for the costs of copying, at 35¢ per page of 14legal size or smaller and $1 for each larger page.15(Source: P.A. 88-455; 89-126, eff. 7-11-95; 89-671, eff. 168-14-96.) 17    (35 ILCS 200/23-15)18    Sec. 23-15. Tax objection procedure and hearing. 19    (a) A tax objection complaint under Section 23-10 shall be 20filed in the circuit court of the county in which the subject 21property is located. Joinder of plaintiffs shall be permitted 22to the same extent permitted by law in any personal action 23pending in the court and shall be in accordance with Section 242-404 of the Code of Civil Procedure; provided, however, that 25no complaint shall be filed as a class action. The complaint   HB1818- 7 -LRB104 08839 HLH 18894 b1shall name the county collector as defendant and may name 2additional defendants as appropriate to the issues, and shall 3specify any objections that the plaintiff may have to the 4taxes in question. No appearance or answer by the county 5collector to the tax objection complaint, nor any further 6pleadings, need be filed. Amendments to the complaint may be 7made to the same extent which, by law, could be made in any 8personal action pending in the court. Answers, motions, and 9other matters related to pleadings shall be in accordance with 10the Code of Civil Procedure, provided that: (1) the county 11collector need not appear or answer or otherwise plead in 12response to the complaint except by order of the court; (2) the 13court shall set by rule or order the initial time for other 14defendants to answer or otherwise plead in response to the 15complaint; and (3) in all cases in which the issues require the 16collector to answer or otherwise plead in response to the 17complaint, the court shall set by order the initial time for 18such answer or other response. The time set for answers or 19other responses shall be no later than 30 days after the 20court's entry of the first case management order or after 21joinder of a defendant subsequent to the first case management 22order. 23    (b) (1) The court, sitting without a jury, shall hear and 24determine all objections specified to the taxes, assessments, 25or levies in question. This Section shall be construed to 26provide a complete remedy for any claims with respect to those   HB1818- 8 -LRB104 08839 HLH 18894 b1taxes, assessments, or levies, excepting only matters for 2which an exclusive remedy is provided elsewhere in this Code.3    (2) The taxes, assessments, and levies that are the 4subject of the objection shall be presumed correct and legal, 5but the presumption is rebuttable. The plaintiff has the 6burden of proving any contested matter of fact is by clear and 7convincing evidence.8    (3) Objections to assessments shall be heard de novo by 9the court. The court shall grant relief in the cases in which 10the objector meets the burden of proof under this Section and 11shows an assessment to be incorrect or illegal. If an 12objection is made claiming incorrect valuation, the court 13shall consider the objection without regard to the correctness 14of any practice, procedure, or method of valuation followed by 15the assessor, board of appeals, or board of review in making or 16reviewing the assessment, and without regard to the intent or 17motivation of any assessing official. The doctrine known as 18constructive fraud is hereby abolished for purposes of all 19challenges to taxes, assessments, or levies.20    (c) If the court orders a refund of any part of the taxes 21paid, it shall also order the payment of interest as provided 22in Section 23-20. Appeals may be taken from final judgments as 23in other civil cases.24    (d) This amendatory Act of 1995 shall apply to all tax 25objection matters still pending for any tax year, except as 26provided in Sections 23-5 and 23-10 regarding procedures and   HB1818- 9 -LRB104 08839 HLH 18894 b1time limitations for payment of taxes and filing tax objection 2complaints.3    (e) In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if 4the court renders a decision lowering the assessment of a 5particular parcel on which a residence occupied by the owner 6is situated, the reduced assessment, subject to equalization, 7shall remain in effect for the remainder of the general 8assessment period as provided in Sections 9-215 through 9-225, 9unless that parcel is subsequently sold in an arm's length 10transaction establishing a fair cash value for the parcel that 11is different from the fair cash value on which the court's 12assessment is based, or unless the decision of the court is 13reversed or modified upon review.14(Source: P.A. 88-455; 88-642, eff. 9-9-94; 89-126, eff. 157-11-95; 89-290, eff. 1-1-96; 89-593, eff. 8-1-96; 89-626, 16eff. 8-9-96.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.